Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1071.
do enact as follows:SB1071,11Section 1. 7.75 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB1071,2,527.75 (3) Notwithstanding sub. (2), no presidential elector may vote for a 3candidate for the office of president or for the office of vice president if it 4conclusively appears, by admission of the candidate or otherwise, that the candidate 5is ineligible under the U.S. Constitution to be elected to that office.SB1071,26Section 2. 8.30 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB1071,2,1178.30 (5) The official or agency with whom a declaration of candidacy is 8required to be filed may not place the name of a candidate for national office on the 9ballot if it conclusively appears, either on the face of the nomination papers offered 10for filing, or by admission of the candidate or otherwise, that the candidate is 11ineligible under the U.S. Constitution to be nominated or elected to that office.SB1071,2,1212